Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Chapter 81. Zoning

§§ 3001-3027.
Repealed.
1967, No. 334 (Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. March 23, 1968.

§ 3028.
Penalty.

The legislative body of a municipality may provide by ordinance for the enforcement of this chapter and of any ordinance or regulation made hereunder, and may fix penalties of not more than $50.00 for each violation. Each day in which a violation exists shall constitute a separate offense.

No action may be brought under this section unless the alleged offender has had at least seven days’ notice that a violation exists. The notice shall be given by the administrative officer by hand or by certified mail with return receipt requested. The start of the seven days’ notice shall be determined by the date said return receipt was signed by or on behalf of the person deemed to be in violation.

This section shall not be construed to limit or restrict the proper municipal authorities from acting under section 3024 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 283

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. March 14, 1968.